Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-101
Act, how cited.

(RULLCA 101) Sections 21-101 to 21-197 and 21-501 to 21-542 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 1.